Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202186-527
Information Technology Infrastructure Fund; created; use; investment.

The Information Technology Infrastructure Fund is hereby created. The fund shall contain gifts, grants, and such other money as is appropriated or transferred by the Legislature. The fund shall be used to attain the goals and priorities identified in the statewide technology plan. The fund shall be administered by the office of Chief Information Officer. Expenditures shall be made from the fund to finance the operations of the Information Technology Infrastructure Act in accordance with the appropriations made by the Legislature. Transfers from the fund to the General Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Information Technology Infrastructure Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1190, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 42;

Laws 2000, LB 1349, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1195;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 297;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 408, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 19;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB509, § 23.
August 28, 2021
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.